Massachusetts, session 194th, S1550.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 138 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 78 the following section:-
Section 79. Any establishment that sells alcoholic beverages shall in a conspicuous
location post a sign that reads, “Warning: Alcohol use causes breast, colon, esophagus, larynx,
liver, mouth and throat cancers.” Said signs, printed in black boldface capital letters not less than
48 point in size on a yellow background, shall be prepared by the commission and distributed to
business establishments that sell, serve or otherwise dispense alcohol or alcoholic beverages to
the public. Said signs shall be so placed as the commissioner of public health by reasonable rules
and regulations shall require.
of 1